District of Columbia statutes.
5-119.12

Sale of unclaimed animals.

Horses and other animals taken by the police and remaining unclaimed for 20 days may be advertised and sold upon 10 days public notice.

R.S., D.C., § 418
This section is referenced in § 5-119.01.
1981 Ed., § 4-163.
1973 Ed., § 4-161.